Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2140.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) The attorney general shall appoint a statewide drug
abuse resistance education (D.A.R.E.) educator and, within the limits of
appropriations available therefor, such additional staff as necessary to
support the functions and responsibilities of the D.A.R.E. educator.
(b) The D.A.R.E. educator shall:
(1) Provide instruction on drug abuse using a curriculum approved by
the attorney general that includes content on fentanyl and other opioid
drugs to students in public elementary and secondary schools;
(2) report annually to the legislature on any modifications to the
curriculum utilized by the attorney general and provide the names and
addresses of the public schools serviced by the program; and
(3) perform other services and provide material and information as
required to support the D.A.R.E. program in Kansas.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.